Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 10 Chiropractors

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

For the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see chapter 24 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

Law reviews. —

See “Liability of Chiropractors for Malpractice,” 10 Wyo. L.J. 131.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers §§ 17 to 22, 35 to 42, 47 to 113.

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancelation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

Podiatry or chiropody statutes: validity, construction and application, 45 ALR4th 888.

Liability of chiropractors and other drugless practitioners for medical malpractice, 77 ALR4th 273.

70 C.J.S. Physicians and Surgeons §§ 11 to 34.

§ 33-10-101.
Chiropractic defined.

Chiropractic is the system of specific adjustment or manipulation of the joints and tissues of the body and the treatment of the human body by the application of manipulative, manual, mechanical, physiotherapeutic or clinical nutritional methods for which those persons licensed under this chapter are trained and may include venipuncture, acupuncture and the use of diagnostic x-rays with rights for referral for advanced diagnostic imaging. A chiropractor may examine, diagnose and treat patients provided, however, chiropractors shall not perform surgery, direct the use of or administer drugs required by law to be dispensed on prescription only, practice obstetrics or prescribe or administer x-ray therapy. For purposes of this act, “venipuncture” means the puncture of the vein for the withdrawal of blood.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 21-104; C.S. 1945, § 37-704; W.S. 1957, § 33-134; Laws 1991, ch. 178, § 1; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in the first sentence, added “venipuncture, acupuncture and” before “the use of diagnostic x-rays” and added “with rights for referral for advanced diagnostic imaging” thereafter and added the last sentence.

Chiropractor properly convicted for sexual assault of patients. —

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that defendant's conduct was third degree sexual assault because he was in a position of authority over his patients. While not engaged in the practice of medicine for purposes of this section, chiropractors governed themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Use of clinical nutrition methods. —

A licensed chiropractor does not violate the Medical Practice Act by diagnosing a disease and by then treating the patient by the application of clinical nutritional methods; such practices constitute the practice of “chiropractic” as defined by this section. Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Med., 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

Chiropractor who diagnosed and treated his grandson's strep throat with nutritional supplements was not “practicing medicine” under § 33-26-102(a)(xi)(B). Johnson v. State ex rel. Wyoming Bd. of Med., 986 P.2d 157,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 33-10-102.
Board of chiropractic examiners; established; composition; qualifications of members.

There is hereby created and established a board to be known as the state board of chiropractic examiners, which shall be composed of one (1) member of the public at large and four (4) practicing chiropractors of integrity and ability, who shall be residents of the state of Wyoming, who shall have practiced chiropractic continuously in the state of Wyoming for a period of at least three (3) years and who shall have a diploma from an accredited chiropractic school or college.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 21-101; C.S. 1945, § 37-701; W.S. 1957, § 33-135; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “one (1) member of the public at large and four (4)” for “three (3)” and “an accredited chiropractic school or college” for “a recognized chiropractic school or college.”

§ 33-10-103.
Board of chiropractic examiners; appointment; term; qualifications; vacancies; removal.

The governor shall appoint four (4) practicing chiropractors, who shall possess the qualifications specified in W.S.

33-10-102

, and one (1) citizen from the public at large to constitute the membership of the board. Members shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years, except that initial terms of chiropractor members shall be staggered so that annually thereafter the governor shall appoint one (1) chiropractor member. The governor shall fill all vacancies occurring in the board. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 21-102; C.S. 1945, § 37-702; W.S. 1957, § 33-136; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “four (4) practicing chiropractors” for “three (3) practicing chiropractors” and added “and one (1) citizen from the public at large” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted “four (4) years” for “three (3) years,” added “of chiropractor members” and “chiropractor member” and deleted the end of the sentence which read: “who shall be a licensed chiropractic practitioner possessing the qualifications specified in W.S.

33-10-102

, and who shall serve for a period of three (3) years or until his successor is appointed.”

§ 33-10-104.
Board of chiropractic examiners; meetings; procedure; records; members to be licensed.

The board of examiners shall convene within thirty (30) days after the appointment of its members and shall elect from its membership a president, vice-president, a treasurer and a secretary and the board may appoint a person who is not a member of the board to fulfill the functions of treasurer or secretary. The board shall hold a regular meeting once each year at the capitol of the state, the date to be set by the board at its first meeting. The board shall hold special meetings at such times and places as a majority of the members thereof may designate. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board shall have authority to administer oaths, take affidavits, summon witnesses and take testimony as to matters coming within the scope of its duties. It shall adopt a seal, which shall be affixed to all licenses issued by it and shall from time to time adopt rules and regulations as are proper and necessary for the performance of its duties. It shall adopt a schedule of minimum educational requirements not inconsistent with the provisions of this law, which shall be without prejudice, partiality or discrimination as to the standard schools of chiropractic. The secretary of said board shall keep a record of the proceedings of the board, which shall at all times be open to public inspection. The board shall also have on file with the secretary of state for public inspection a copy of its rules and regulations.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 185, § 2.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 21-103; C.S. 1945, § 37-703; W.S. 1957, § 33-137; 2013 ch. 185, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “a treasurer and a secretary and the board may appoint a person who is not a member of the board to fulfill the functions of treasurer or secretary” for “and secretary treasurer” in the first sentence and deleted “provided that not more than three (3) meetings shall be held in any one (1) year” at the end of the third sentence; repealed former (b) which read: “A license to practice chiropractic within this state shall be issued to the individual members of said board at first meeting, upon payment by each board member of the regular fee, as provided for in this act [ §§

33-10-101

through

33-10-117

].”

§ 33-10-105.
License required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to practice chiropractic in this state without first obtaining a license, as provided for in this act.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the activities and services of a person pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in chiropractic at an accredited college or university, if the activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study and the person is a designated chiropractic intern or preceptor appropriate to his level of training and as authorized by rules and regulations of the board.

The board pursuant to its rules and regulations may issue a temporary license to an applicant who is licensed or certified by a board of chiropractic of another United States state or territory, or of a foreign country or province whose standards are equal to or exceed the requirements for licensure as a chiropractor in this state.

No business entity organized under title 17 of the Wyoming statutes shall employ or contract with a chiropractor to provide chiropractic services unless fifty-one percent (51%) of the equity in the entity is owned by persons, and the spouses of persons, licensed pursuant to title 33, chapter 9, 10 or 26 of the Wyoming statutes. This subsection shall not apply to:

A health care facility as defined in W.S. 35-2-901(a)(x);

Clinical facilities affiliated with a college of chiropractic which provides training for chiropractic students and which is accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation organization;

A public or private university or college;

Any agency of federal, state or local government;

Any partnership or other business entity authorized to be formed under title 17 of the Wyoming statutes and which is owned with other health care providers.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 21-105; C.S. 1945, § 37-705; W.S. 1957, § 33-138; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (b) through (d)(v) and made a related change.

§ 33-10-106.
Application for license; educational requirements; fees.

Any person wishing to practice chiropractic in this state shall make application to the board of chiropractic examiners, upon such form and in such manner as may be prescribed and directed by the board. Each applicant shall be a graduate of a recognized school of chiropractic having an accredited program which is professional in content and which meets the academic and training standards established by the board. There shall be paid by each applicant a license fee in an amount established by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

which fee shall accompany the application.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 21-106; Laws 1939, ch. 54, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-706; Laws 1957, ch. 148, § 1; ch. 242, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-139; Laws 1961, ch. 122, § 1; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 33-10-107.
Time, place and subjects for examinations; reexamination.

Examinations for license to practice chiropractic shall be given by the board at such times and places as it shall determine.

All examinations shall be made in writing and shall include those subjects identified by the board in its rules and regulations.

A license shall be granted to all applicants who achieve an overall passing grade and a passing grade in each subject area as determined by the board in its rules and regulations. An applicant who fails to pass the examination may take a second examination at any time within one (1) year from and after his first failure without the payment of any additional fees.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 7; R.S. 1931, § 21-107; C.S. 1945, § 37-707; W.S. 1957, § 33-140; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 33-10-108.
Duties and authority of practitioners.

Chiropractic practitioners shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal regulations relating to the control of contagious and infectious diseases and shall, as to any and all matters pertaining to public health, report to the proper health officers the same as other practitioners.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 21-108; C.S. 1945, § 37-708; W.S. 1957, § 33-141; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, deleted “shall be permitted to sign death certificates” after “infectious diseases.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of practice of chiropractic, 16 ALR4th 58.

§ 33-10-109.
Title of practitioners.

Chiropractors licensed under this act shall have the right to practice chiropractic in accordance with the method taught in the chiropractic schools and colleges recognized by the chiropractic board of examiners of this state. If a chiropractor chooses to use the prefix “Dr.” or “doctor” on any display sign before the name of the practitioner, the display shall also include the title “doctor of chiropractic,” “chiropractor,” “D.C.” or the equivalent.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 21-109; C.S. 1945, § 37-709; W.S. 1957, § 33-142; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in the second sentence added “If a chiropractor chooses to use” at the beginning, deleted “shall not appear” after “‘doctor,’” substituted “the display shall also include” for “but shall appear in connection with,” and added “‘chiropractor,’ ‘D.C.’ or the equivalent” at the end, and deleted the former third sentence which read: “Said title shall appear in same size type as name of practitioner.”

Chiropractor convicted of sexual assault held a position of authority over patients. —

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that defendant's conduct was third degree sexual assault because he was in a position of authority over his patients. While not engaged in the practice of medicine for purposes of this section, chiropractors governed themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Quoted

in

Apodaca v. Ommen, 807 P.2d 939,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 33-10-110.
Prohibited acts; refusal, revocation or suspension of license; appeals.

The board may deny, refuse to renew, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict a license under this act for any of the following acts:

To knowingly submit false or misleading information to the board;

To perform or attempt to perform an unlawful abortion or assist or advise the performance of any unlawful abortion;

To commit or be convicted of a felony that relates to the practice of chiropractic or to the ability to practice chiropractic;

To become addicted to a drug or intoxicant to such a degree as to render the licensee unsafe or unfit to practice chiropractic;

To practice chiropractic while having any physical or mental disability which renders the practice of chiropractic dangerous;

To be guilty of any dishonest, unethical or unprofessional conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public;

To use willfully any false or fraudulent statement in any document connected with the practice of chiropractic;

To knowingly perform any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice chiropractic;

To violate or attempt to violate, directly or indirectly or assist in or abet the violation or conspiring to violate any provision or terms of the Chiropractic Practice Act [§§

33-10-101

through

33-10-117

];

To practice chiropractic while adjudged mentally incompetent or insane;

To practice chiropractic under a false or assumed name;

To advertise the practice of chiropractic in any unethical or unprofessional manner;

To obtain a fee as personal compensation or gain to an employer or for a person on fraudulent representation that a manifestly incurable condition can be permanently cured;

To willfully violate any privileged communication;

To aid or abet the practice of chiropractic by a person who is not licensed by the board;

To violate any code of ethics or disciplinary rules established by the board.

through (e) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 185, § 2.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

Unless the board and the licensee have agreed to the relinquishment of or imposition of restrictions or conditions on a license, the board shall conduct a proceeding to deny, refuse to renew, suspend, revoke or otherwise restrict a license on the grounds set forth in subsection (a) of this section as a contested case under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 21-110; C.S. 1945, § 37-710; Laws 1957, ch. 148, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-143; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2013 ch. 185, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

See also §

33-10-111

as to appeal from decision of board.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a) and (a)(i) and added (a)(xv), (a)(xvi) and (g); and repealed former (b) through (e) which read: “(b) The board shall refuse to issue a license or certificate to any applicant proved guilty of any of the acts stated in section (a), and the board may revoke the license and certificate or suspend the license and certificate of any licensee proved guilty of any of the acts stated in section (a). (c) Before refusing, revoking or suspending any license or certificate for any of the causes stated in section (a), the board shall give notice in writing by mailing by United States registered mail to the licensee or applicant at his last known address in Wyoming a statement of the nature of the offense charged. The licensee or applicant shall have thirty (30) days after mailing of the notice to file with the board a written statement of the nature of his defense. If no defense shall have been filed, the board shall proceed ex parte forthwith to hear proof of the charge, and, if proven, shall refuse, suspend or revoke the license and certificate. If the licensee or applicant shall file a defense, the matter forthwith shall be set for hearing by the board. (d)
At the hearing, the board shall be represented and advised by the attorney general and any complainant, applicant or licensee may be represented by counsel. The board and any complainant, applicant or licensee shall have the power to require by subpoena the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of papers. The fees and mileage for witnesses shall be the same as prescribed by law for trial by district courts in civil cases. In case of disobedience to a subpoena, the aid of any court of competent jurisdiction may be invoked and such court may issue an order requiring the witness to appear before the board and give evidence and to produce papers and any failure to obey such order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. The testimony at the hearing shall be recorded in shorthand or by some other generally used method of taking and recording testimony if required by the board or demanded by the complainant, applicant or licensee, provided that the board or party making such demand shall arrange and pay for the same. (e) Within thirty (30) days after the hearing, the board shall make its order in writing stating its decision. The complainant, applicant or licensee may appeal from such order to the district court in which he resides or to the district court of Laramie county by filing with the board within fifteen (15) days thereafter a written notice of appeal. Within thirty (30) days after receipt of the notice of appeal, unless the time shall be extended by order of the court appealed to, the board shall certify and deliver to the district court appealed to the original statement of the nature of the offense charged and the defense, or true and certified copies thereof. The appellant shall have five (5) days thereafter to perfect his appeal by filing with the clerk of the district court and with the board and any other parties a copy of the notice of appeal and a petition stating the grounds for the appeal, and if appellant shall fail to do so within the time fixed, the appeal shall be dismissed with prejudice by the court. The order shall remain in effect during the appeal unless the judge of the district court appealed to at any time after making of the order by the board, after three (3) days notice to the board giving an opportunity to be heard with respect thereto, shall fix a bond in a sum to be determined by the court in favor of the people of the state of Wyoming and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the requirements of his license during the appeal. Said bond shall be for the benefit of any persons damaged by any act of the appellant during the appeal or any time prior thereto, and any person so damaged may bring an action against the appellant and the sureties on the bond. Trial before the district court on said appeal shall be de novo and without a jury. The judgment of the district court may be appealed to the supreme court in the manner provided by law for appeal of civil matters.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iii), added “that relates to the practice of chiropractic or to the ability to practice chiropractic” at the end; and in(b)(iii), substituted “that relate to the practice of optometry or to the ability to practice optometry or involving” for “involving moral turpitude” preceding “habitual intemperance.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Substantial Evidence. —

Order indefinitely suspending a practitioner's license to practice as a chiropractor was affirmed because it was supported by substantial evidence including the testimony of several patients, including a complainant, that the practitioner had improperly massaged them, and the practitioner's conflicting statements and testimony.
Greene v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of Chiropractic Examiners, 2009 WY 42, 204 P.3d 285,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of practice of chiropractic, 16 ALR4th 58.

§ 33-10-111.
Appeal from decision of board.

Any person aggrieved by the decision of the board may petition for judicial review pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 21-117; C.S. 1945, § 37-717; W.S. 1957, § 33-144; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

See also §

33-10-110

as to appeal from decision of board.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “circuit court ” for “justice court.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See
§ 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Law reviews. —

See “Scope of Review of Decision of an Administrative Agency in Wyoming,” 9 Wyo. L.J. 65 (1954).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 33-10-113.
Prerequisite for renewal of license; board's power to make regulations; fees.

Each chiropractor shall, as a prerequisite to annual license renewal, submit as a part of the renewal application satisfactory evidence of having completed the continuing education requirements established by the board in its rules and regulations.

The board shall also adopt rules and regulations authorizing the board to grant exceptions to the educational requirements.

All persons practicing chiropractic within this state shall pay on or before August 1 of each year, a renewal license fee in an amount established by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. If any practicing chiropractor fails to pay the renewal license fee imposed by W.S.

33-10-101

through

33-10-117

within thirty (30) days after the due date, the license shall lapse. A lapsed license shall only be restored within one (1) year of expiration upon written application and payment to the board of a fee of twice the amount of the renewal fee in effect at the time the restoration application is filed.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 113, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-146.1; Laws 1978, ch. 36, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 33-10-114.
Disposition of money collected; expenses of board; compensation of members.

All money shall be received and collected as provided by law. All money received or collected under this chapter shall be remitted to the state treasurer by the board for deposit in a separate account. The money in the account is subject at all times to the warrant of the state auditor drawn upon written requisition attested by the executive director of the board for the payment of any board expenses.

The members of the board shall receive as salary the sum paid each day to legislators, or an equivalent hourly wage, together with per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii).

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 185, § 2.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 21-113; C.S. 1945, § 37-713; Laws 1957, ch. 242, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-147; Laws 1961, ch. 122, § 3; 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2013 ch. 185, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the second sentence, substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a) and (b); and repealed former (c) which read: “The board may, in its discretion, give the secretary-treasurer compensation not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200.00) per year for the time spent by him in keeping the accounts of the board, drawing vouchers, or in the preparation of the report to the governor.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (b), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “allowance as allowed to state employees, when actually engaged in official board duties.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “remitted to the state treasurer by the board” for “paid to the state treasurer” in the second sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-10-116.
Violation of W.S. 33-10-101 through 33-10-117.

Any person, corporation or association who shall practice, or attempt to practice, chiropractic, or any person who shall buy, sell, or fraudulently obtain any diplomas or licenses to practice chiropractic, or who shall use the title “doctor of chiropractic”, or any word or title to influence belief that he is engaged in the practice of chiropractic, without first complying with the provisions of this act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment.

The attorney general, the state board of chiropractic examiners or any county attorney may obtain an injunction in the name of the state of Wyoming upon the relation of such complainant enjoining any person, corporation or association and the officer and directors and employees of such corporation or association from engaging in the practice of chiropractic without a license and certificate or violation of any of the provisions of this chapter. The district court of the district in which the offending party resides or the district court of Laramie county shall have original jurisdiction of any such injunction proceedings. Any defendant who has been so enjoined who shall violate such injunction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both. An injunction may be issued without proof of actual damage sustained and upon proof of one (1) or more acts constituting practice of chiropractic without a license or in violation of any provision of this chapter.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 15; R.S. 1931, § 21-115; C.S. 1945, § 37-715; Laws 1957, ch. 148, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 33-149; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), deleted “less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor” before “more than” and substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) dollars” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00)” thereafter; and substituted “more than one (1) year” for “less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months” and in (b), deleted “or any licensed doctor of chiropractic in the state of Wyoming,” making a related change in the first sentence and in the third sentence, deleted “for contempt of court” before “by a fine of not” and deleted “less than two hundred dollars *$200.00) or” thereafter and deleted “in the county jail” after “imprisonment” and “not less than six (6) months or” before “not more than one (1) year.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of practice of chiropractic, 16 ALR4th 58.

§ 33-10-117.
Restrictions.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to restrain or restrict licensed or certified members of other legally recognized professions from performing services consistent with the laws of this state, provided they do not represent themselves as practicing the profession regulated under this act and do not represent themselves to be chiropractors. Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to restrain or restrict the practice of venipuncture or acupuncture.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 25, § 16; R.S. 1931, § 21-116; C.S. 1945, § 37-716; W.S. 1957, § 33-150; 2013 ch. 185, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Chiropractor convicted of sexual assault held a position of authority over patients. —

Where patients testified that they were victims of a chiropractor who touched their breasts and pubic areas and made inappropriate remarks during chiropractic treatment, the Supreme Court of Wyoming held that defendant's conduct was third degree sexual assault because he was in a position of authority over his patients. While not engaged in the practice of medicine for purposes of this section, chiropractors governed themselves by ethical codes advising practitioners not to take physical advantage of any patient.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).